Connecticut, session 2026, SB00011.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of eight hundred thousand dollars be appropriated to
the Department of Education, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, for the preapprenticeship grant program,
established under section 10-21p of the general statutes.